Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-1,128
Brand with brand recorded or registered
in another state; application for out-of-state brand permit; contents; fee.

(1) An owner may
brand cattle with a brand recorded or registered in another state when:

(a) Cattle are
purchased at a livestock auction market licensed under the Livestock Auction
Market Act or congregated at another location approved by the Nebraska Brand
Committee;

(b) The cattle will be imminently exported from Nebraska;

(c) The cattle
are branded at the livestock auction market or other approved location; and

(d) An out-of-state
brand permit has been obtained prior to branding the cattle.

(2) An application
for an out-of-state brand permit shall be made to a brand inspector and shall
include a description of the brand, a written application, and a fee not to
exceed fifty dollars as determined by the Nebraska Brand Committee. A brand
inspector shall evaluate and may approve an out-of-state brand permit within
a reasonable period of time.

(3) Cattle branded under an out-of-state brand permit shall remain
subject to all other brand inspection requirements under the Livestock Brand
Act.

Laws 2013, LB435, § 4.

Livestock Auction Market Act, see section 54-1156.